Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1082.
do enact as follows:AB1082,14Section 1. 77.51 (1e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1082,2,4577.51 (1e) “Breast pump” means an electrically or manually controlled pump 1device designed or marketed to be used to express milk from a human breast during 2lactation. “Breast pump” includes the electrically or manually controlled pump 3device and a battery, alternating current adapter, or power supply unit packaged 4and sold with the pump device at the time of sale to power the pump device.AB1082,25Section 2. 77.51 (1eb) of the statutes is created to read:AB1082,2,9677.51 (1eb) “Breast pump collection and storage supplies” means items of 7tangible personal property designed or marketed to be used in conjunction with a 8breast pump to collect milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 9milk until it is ready for consumption.AB1082,2,1610(b) “Breast pump collection and storage supplies” includes breast shields and 11breast shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; breast pump 12valves and membranes; backflow protectors and backflow protector adapters; 13breast bottles and bottle caps specific to the operation of the breast pump; breast 14milk storage bags; and other items that may be useful to initiate, support, or 15sustain breastfeeding using a breast pump during lactation, that may be sold 16separately, but are generally sold as part of a breast pump kit.AB1082,2,1917(c) “Breast pump collection and storage supplies” does not include any of the 18following, unless sold as part of a breast pump kit prepackaged by the breast pump 19manufacturer or distributor:AB1082,2,20201. Bottles and bottle caps not specific to the operation of the breast pump.AB1082,2,22212. Breast pump travel bags and other similar carrying accessories, including 22ice packs, labels, and other similar products.AB1082,2,23233. Breast pump cleaning supplies.AB1082,2,24244. Nursing bras, bra pads, breast shells, and other similar products.AB1082,3,215. Creams, ointments, and other similar products that relieve breastfeeding-2related symptoms or conditions of the breasts or nipples.AB1082,33Section 3. 77.51 (1ef) of the statutes is created to read:AB1082,3,9477.51 (1ef) “Breast pump kit” means a kit that contains a breast pump and 5breast pump collection and storage supplies or other items of tangible personal 6property that may be useful to initiate, support, or sustain breastfeeding using a 7breast pump during lactation, if the sales price of any taxable items of tangible 8personal property sold as part of the kit at the time of sale is less than 10 percent of 9the total sales price of the breast pump kit.AB1082,410Section 4. 77.52 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1082,3,221177.52 (13) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 12prevent evasion of the sales tax it shall be presumed that all receipts are subject to 13the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of 14tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), 15or services is not a taxable sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale 16unless that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or a paper certificate, in 17a manner prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, item, good, 18or service is purchased for resale or is otherwise exempt, except that no certificate is 19required for the sale of tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods 20under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (5) (a) 3., (7), 21(7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), (20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), 22(44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), (67), (71), and (72), and (76).AB1082,523Section 5. 77.53 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1082,4,132477.53 (10) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 1prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it is presumed 2that tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), 3(c), or (d), or taxable services sold by any person for delivery in this state is sold for 4storage, use, or other consumption in this state until the contrary is established. 5The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale unless 6that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or paper certificate, in a manner 7prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, or items, property, or 8goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or (d), or taxable service is purchased for resale, or 9otherwise exempt from the tax, except that no certificate is required for the sale of 10tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or 11(d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (7), (7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), 12(20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), (44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), 13(67), (71), and (72), and (76).AB1082,614Section 6. 77.54 (76) of the statutes is created to read:AB1082,4,171577.54 (76) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 16consumption of breast pumps, breast pump kits, and breast pump collection and 17storage supplies. This subsection does not apply after June 30, 2027.AB1082,718Section 7. Effective date.AB1082,4,2019(1) Breastfeeding equipment. This act takes effect on the first day of the 203rd month beginning after publication.AB1082,4,2121